Georgia statutes. 
Cited in Baker v. City of Marietta, 271 Ga. 210, 518 S.E.2d 879 (1999); Higdon v. City of Senoia, 273 Ga. 83, 538 S.E.2d 39 (2000).

——————————

ARTICLE 1A

ANNEXATION BY LOCAL ACT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY

36-36-15. "Used for residential purposes" defined.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term "used for residential purposes" means any lot or tract five acres or less in size on which is constructed a habitable dwelling unit.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 192, § 2.)

36-36-16. Procedures for annexation; referendum.

Statute text

(a) Local Acts of the General Assembly proposing annexation of any area comprised of more than 50 percent by acreage of property used for residential purposes shall be adopted pursuant to the procedures of this article.

(b) Such bill may include a requirement for referendum approval of the annexation under such terms and conditions as specified in such local law; provided, however, if the number of residents in the area to be annexed exceeds 3 percent of the population of the municipal corporation or 500 people, whichever is less, as determined by the most recent United States decennial census, referendum approval shall be required in the area to be annexed. The cost of holding the referendum required by this article shall be paid from funds of the municipality proposing the annexation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 192, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 985, § 4.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

——————————

ARTICLE 2

ANNEXATION PURSUANT TO APPLICATION BY 100 PERCENT OF LANDOWNERS

Annotations

Cross references. - Time limit for reannexing property which has been deannexed by the General Assembly, § 36-35-2(b).

36-36-20. "Contiguous area" defined.

Statute text

(a) As used in this article, the term "contiguous area" means, at the time the annexation procedures are initiated, any area that meets the following conditions:

(1) At least one-eighth of the aggregate external boundary or 50 feet of the area to be annexed, whichever is less, either abuts directly on the municipal boundary or would directly abut on the municipal boundary if it were not otherwise separated from the municipal boundary by lands owned by the municipal corporation or some other political subdivision, by lands owned by this state, or by the definite width of:

(A) Any street or street right of way;

(B) Any creek or river; or

(C) Any right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation

which divides the municipal boundary and any area proposed to be annexed;

(2) The entire parcel or parcels of real property owned by the person seeking annexation is being annexed; provided, however, that lots shall not be subdivided in an effort to evade the requirements of this paragraph; and

(3) The private property annexed, excluding any right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation, complies with the annexing municipality's minimum size requirements, if any, to construct a building or structure occupiable by persons or property under the policies or regulations of the municipal development, zoning, or subdivision ordinances.

(b) Notwithstanding the limitations of subsection (a) of this Code section, an area may be annexed by agreement between the municipal corporation and the governing body of the county in which the territory proposed to be annexed is located.

(c) If, at the time annexation procedures are initiated, the entire area to be annexed is owned by the municipal governing authority to which the area is to be annexed and if the annexation of municipally owned property is approved by resolution of the governing authority of the county wherein the property is located, then the term "contiguous area" shall mean any area which, at the time annexation procedures are initiated, abuts directly on the municipal boundary or which would directly abut on the municipal boundary if it were not otherwise separated from the municipal boundary by lands owned by the municipal corporation or some other political subdivision, by lands owned by this state, or by the definite width or by the length of:

(1) Any street or street right of way;

(2) Any creek or river; or

(3) Any right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation

which divides the municipal boundary and any area proposed to be annexed.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1011, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-36-1; Code 1981, § 36-36-20, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 5.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-1 as present Code Section 36-36-20.

Law reviews. - For article discussing municipal annexation and the concept of contiguity, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 167 (1974). For article questioning the constitutionality of this Code section, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 169 (1975). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005); and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005); and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 477 (2006).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Annexation not improper. - Strip of land excepted from annexation by a city was excepted not in an effort to evade the "entire parcel" requirement of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20(a)(2), but to annex the property without creating an unincorporated island in violation of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-4(a); there was no showing that the landowner subdivided the property to evade the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20(a)(2), and the appellate court affirmed a trial court's refusal to enter a judgment declaring that a city's annexation was null and void, declining to reach a finding that would, in effect, have left the landowner no way of having the landowner's property annexed. Fayette County v. Steele, 268 Ga. App. 13, 601 S.E.2d 403 (2004).

County estopped to oppose annexation. - County was estopped from challenging a city's annexation of county roads by the county's failure to oppose the annexation for 20 years. The county had approved the annexation, and the city, with the county's knowledge, maintained the roads, patrolled the roads, set speed limits, and otherwise exercised control over the roads. City of Holly Springs v. Cherokee County, 299 Ga. App. 451, 682 S.E.2d 644 (2009).

Annexation not ultra vires. - City's failure to finalize the city's annexation of county roads by adopting an ordinance, preparing a survey, and filing the annexation with the Georgia Secretary of State were errors of omission, not ultra vires actions contrary to former O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-1 and 36-36-2 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-20 and 36-36-21) which the city had no power to take. Therefore, O.C.G.A. § 45-6-5 did not preclude the city from contending that the county was estopped from challenging the annexation. City of Holly Springs v. Cherokee County, 299 Ga. App. 451, 682 S.E.2d 644 (2009).

Limited applicability of section. - Obvious purpose of this definition of "contiguous" is to explain the Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21) provision for annexing to the existing corporate limits unincorporated areas "contiguous to the existing corporate limits." This provision has no reference to any lands where the owners sign no application to annex. The law's sole purpose is to say that although a road, creek, river, interstate highway, railroad, or even other municipal property of another political subdivision passes between the lands of "A" and the corporate boundary, "A's" land is contiguous for the purpose of annexing the land when "A" signs an application therefor. City of Adel v. Georgia Power Co., 224 Ga. 232, 161 S.E.2d 297 (1968).

Cited in City of Gainesville v. Hall County Bd. of Educ., 233 Ga. 77, 209 S.E.2d 637 (1974); City of Marietta v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 237 Ga. 518, 228 S.E.2d 894 (1976); Paulding County v. City of Hiram, 240 Ga. 220, 240 S.E.2d 71 (1977); City of Cartersville v. Bartow County Sch. Dist., 145 Ga. App. 129, 243 S.E.2d 293 (1978); City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997); City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Property of one of owners must abut directly upon municipal boundary. - Upon consideration of Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20) in conjunction with Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21), in order for a municipal corporation to annex property, at least one of the owners of the property to be annexed must have property which abuts directly on the municipal boundary, or which would otherwise abut directly on the municipal boundary except for the fact that the property is separated by a street, street right of way, creek, river, the right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation, lands owned by the city or some other political subdivision, or lands owned by the state. Right of way for a state-aid road which is owned by the state would qualify as lands owned by the State of Georgia. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-49.

It is necessary for owner of road to sign or consent to petition for annexation; neither the State Transportation Board nor the commissioner of transportation has authority to consent for such annexation. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-81.

Signing of petition. - Neither State Highway Board (now State Transportation Board) nor director of State Highway Department (now Commissioner of Transportation) has authority to sign petition for annexation of right of way of state-aid road as part of the corporate limits of a municipality of this state. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-217.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 53 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 63 et seq.

ALR. - What land is contiguous or adjacent to municipality so as to be subject to annexation, 49 A.L.R.3d 589.

36-36-21. Annexation upon application of all land owners; filing of identification of annexed property with Department of Community Affairs and county governing authority; effect of annexation.

Statute text

Authority is granted to the governing bodies of the several municipal corporations of this state to annex to the existing corporate limits thereof unincorporated areas contiguous to the existing corporate limits at the time of such annexation, in accordance with the procedures provided in this article and in Article 1 of this chapter, upon the written and signed applications of all of the owners of all of the land, except the owners of any public street, road, highway, or right of way, proposed to be annexed, containing a complete description of the lands to be annexed. Lands to be annexed at any one time shall be treated as one body, regardless of the number of owners, and all parts shall be considered as adjoining the limits of the municipal corporation when any one part of the entire body abuts such limits. When such application is acted upon by the municipal authorities and the land is, by ordinance, annexed to the municipal corporation, an identification of the property so annexed shall be filed with the Department of Community Affairs and with the governing authority of the county in which the property is located in accordance with Code Section 36-36-3. When so annexed, such lands shall constitute a part of the lands within the corporate limits of the municipal corporation as completely and fully as if the limits had been marked and defined by local Act of the General Assembly. Except as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 36-36-20, nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize annexation of the length of any public right of way except to the extent that such right of way adjoins private property otherwise annexed by the municipal corporation.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 504, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-36-2; Code 1981, § 36-36-21, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 6.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article questioning the constitutionality of this Code section, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 169 (1975). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

For comment, "Hamlets: Expanding the Fair Share Doctrine Under Strict Home Rule Constitutions," see 49 Emory L.J. 255 (2000).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Land Subject to Annexation

General Consideration

General Assembly intended that a liberal policy apply in this area. Powers v. City of Cordele, 143 Ga. App. 363, 238 S.E.2d 721 (1977).

No intent to race for annexation. - Georgia General Assembly did not intend the alternative methods of annexation under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-10 to establish a system for municipalities to race the legislature to annex land that it already had designated for annexation under local law. City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014).

General Assembly is authorized to delegate power of annexation to municipalities under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21. Cooper v. City of Gainesville, 248 Ga. 269, 282 S.E.2d 322 (1981).

Purpose of this section in delegating limited power of annexation to municipalities is to permit municipalities to make a self-determination in this regard. Plantation Pipe Line Co. v. City of Bremen, 227 Ga. 1, 178 S.E.2d 868 (1970) (see O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21).

Limitations on power of annexation. - When the municipality exercises the delegated power of annexation the municipality is exercising the legislative power of the General Assembly and is limited only by the terms of the delegation itself and by the rule that the municipality's exercise must be lawful and reasonable and not in violation of any constitutional inhibition. Plantation Pipe Line Co. v. City of Bremen, 227 Ga. 1, 178 S.E.2d 868 (1970).

Municipality without authority to annex property during referendum process. - Trial court properly held that a municipality did not have the authority under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21 to annex land that the Georgia General Assembly designated for annexation to another municipality, subject to a referendum, before the referendum took place; thus, a city was prohibited from attempting to annex property during the referendum process. City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014).

Comparison of 100 percent and 60 percent methods of annexation. - Requirements of the 100 percent method and the 60 percent method are different. In the 100 percent method, the land being annexed need only abut the municipal boundaries. In the 60 percent method, the land being annexed must coincide with the municipal boundaries on one-eighth of the municipality's aggregate external boundary. City of Marietta v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 237 Ga. 518, 228 S.E.2d 894 (1976).

Applicability to counties of 100,000 or more. - Municipalities either wholly or partly within county having population of 100,000 or more persons cannot annex territory. Jones v. City of College Park, 223 Ga. 778, 158 S.E.2d 384 (1967).

Limited applicability of definition of contiguous area. - Obvious purpose of the definition of "contiguous" in Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20) is to explain the provision of Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21) for annexing to the existing corporate limits unincorporated areas "contiguous to the existing corporate limits." This provision has no reference to any lands when the owners sign no application to annex. This provision's sole purpose is to say that although a road, creek, river, interstate highway, railroad, or even other municipal property of another political subdivision passes between the lands of "A" and the corporate boundary, "A's" land is contiguous for the purpose of annexing the land when "A" signs an application therefor. City of Adel v. Georgia Power Co., 224 Ga. 232, 161 S.E.2d 297 (1968).

Word "owner" is defined to mean "the record title holder of the fee simple title, or his legal representative." City of Cartersville v. Bartow County Sch. Dist., 145 Ga. App. 129, 243 S.E.2d 293 (1978).

Failure of annexation voids subsequently related annexation. - Failure of city's annexation of railroad right of way due to applicant's lack of fee simple ownership also invalidated subsequent annexation of property which became contiguous to city only by virtue of the earlier annexation of the right of way. City of Jefferson v. Town of Pendergrass, 176 Ga. App. 769, 337 S.E.2d 343 (1985).

Annexation voided when procedures not followed. - Defendants attempt to annex certain properties into the corporate limits of the city and establish a new zoning district was voided because the procedural requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-66-4 (a) and (b) and O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21 were not met. City of Byron v. Betancourt, 242 Ga. App. 71, 528 S.E.2d 841 (2000).

County estopped to oppose annexation. - County was estopped from challenging a city's annexation of county roads by the county's failure to oppose the annexation for 20 years. The county had approved the annexation, and the city, with the county's knowledge, maintained the roads, patrolled the roads, set speed limits, and otherwise exercised control over the roads. City of Holly Springs v. Cherokee County, 299 Ga. App. 451, 682 S.E.2d 644 (2009).

Annexation not ultra vires. - City's failure to finalize the city's annexation of county roads by adopting an ordinance, preparing a survey, and filing the annexation with the Georgia Secretary of State were errors of omission, not ultra vires actions contrary to former O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-1 and 36-36-2 (see O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-20 and 36-36-21) which the city had no power to take. Therefore, O.C.G.A. § 45-6-5 did not preclude the city from contending that the county was estopped from challenging the annexation. City of Holly Springs v. Cherokee County, 299 Ga. App. 451, 682 S.E.2d 644 (2009).

Cited in Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971); City of Gainesville v. Hall County Bd. of Educ., 233 Ga. 77, 209 S.E.2d 637 (1974); City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

Land Subject to Annexation

Under this method of annexation the only property involved is that of the owner who applies for annexation. This section merely gives the owner a free election as to whether to have the land within or without the municipality, provided the land is contiguous to an area of the city and the city is willing to annex. Paulding County v. City of Hiram, 240 Ga. 220, 240 S.E.2d 71 (1977).

Annexation in steps. - Municipality, utilizing the 100 percent method of annexation may annex a street, then annex tracts abutting upon that street. Such areas of land meet the requirement of being "contiguous to the existing corporate limits" when they adjoin and abut directly on a street or highway which has been made a part of the corporate limits. City of Marietta v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 237 Ga. 518, 228 S.E.2d 894 (1976).

Inclusion of all property. - This section imposes no requirement that all of the property located within the outer perimeter of such area be included within the annexation. City of Cartersville v. Bartow County Sch. Dist., 145 Ga. App. 129, 243 S.E.2d 293 (1978).

Presumption of dedication of land for public streets. - When the owner of a tract of land subdivides the land into lots, and records a map or plat showing such lots with designated streets, and sells lots with reference to such map or plat, the owner will be presumed to have expressly dedicated the streets designated on the map to the public. Young v. Sweetbriar, Inc., 222 Ga. 262, 149 S.E.2d 474 (1966).

How acceptance by municipality shown. - When an owner of land makes an express dedication of a particular portion thereof for use as a public street, its acceptance may be shown by any act of the municipality recognizing the existence of the street as such, and treating it as one of the streets of the city. Young v. Sweetbriar, Inc., 222 Ga. 262, 149 S.E.2d 474 (1966).

Grantor estopped to deny grantees right to use streets. - When a grantor sells lots of land, and in the grantor's deeds describes the lots as bounded by streets, not expressly mentioned in the deeds, but shown upon a plat therein referred to as laid out in a subdivision of the grantor's land, the grantor is estopped to deny the grantee's right to use the streets delineated in such plat. Those claiming under such conveyances are estopped from denying the existence of the streets so delineated upon the plat of the subdivision and given as boundaries of lots acquired by these and others from the grantor or those claiming under the grantor. Young v. Sweetbriar, Inc., 222 Ga. 262, 149 S.E.2d 474 (1966).

Dedication cannot be abandoned by nonuser. - When land is dedicated to and accepted by a city for street purposes, such dedication inures to the benefit of the public and abutting property owners who bought abutting property by reference to plats showing such streets. Such dedication cannot be abandoned by the dedicatee by mere nonuser. Young v. Sweetbriar, Inc., 222 Ga. 262, 149 S.E.2d 474 (1966).

Validity of proposed annexation not justiciable. - City's declaratory judgment action seeking to determine the validity of a proposed annexation, to which the county objected based on a local constitutional amendment creating the industrial district sought to be annexed which prohibited annexation, presented no justiciable controversy because the annexation was merely proposed. Fulton County v. City of Atlanta, 299 Ga. 676, 791 S.E.2d 821 (2016).

Sale does not revoke dedication. - After an owner of land has made a dedication of designated land for public streets, and the public authorities have accepted the dedication, the owner cannot revoke the dedication by a sale of the land. Young v. Sweetbriar, Inc., 222 Ga. 262, 149 S.E.2d 474 (1966).

Preemption based on authority of Public Service Commission. - Regulation of the construction of electric power substations by municipalities was preempted based on the authority given to the Public Service Commission under O.C.G.A. § 46-2-20. City of Buford v. Ga. Power Co., 276 Ga. 590, 581 S.E.2d 16 (2003).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

It is necessary for owner of road to sign or consent to petition for annexation; neither the State Transportation Board nor the commissioner of transportation has authority to consent for such annexation. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-81.

Property of one owner must abut directly upon municipal boundary. - Upon consideration of Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-20), in conjunction with Ga. L. 1962, p. 119, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21), in order for a municipal corporation to annex property, at least one of the owners of the property to be annexed must have property which abuts directly on the municipal boundary, or which would otherwise abut directly on the municipal boundary except for the fact that the property is separated by a street, street right of way, creek, river, the right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation, lands owned by the city or some other political subdivision, or lands owned by the state. Right of way for a state-aid road which is owned by the state would qualify as lands owned by the state. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-49.

Annexation of state park. - Municipality must have specific legislative approval to annex state park. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-211.

Consent referred to in this section would have to come from the General Assembly. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-211.

Signing of petition. - Neither State Highway Board (now State Transportation Board) nor director of State Highway Department (now commissioner of transportation) has authority to sign petition for annexation of right of way of state-aid road as part of the corporate limits of a municipality of this state. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-217.

Requirements for inclusion of boundary street in annexation ordinance. - Under the particular annexation ordinances adopted by a city, in which one boundary of the area to be annexed is a public street, such public street is not itself included within the corporate boundaries unless the annexation ordinance specifically includes the street within such boundaries, and the city police are not authorized to patrol or to make cases on any such street which lies outside the municipal boundary. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-64.

"Owners" includes transferors of deeds to secure debt. - This section providing for the annexation of certain lands includes within "owners" the transferors of deeds to secure debt, rather than the grantees in such deeds. 1972 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U72-105.

Use of adjective "public" preceding "streets" necessarily applies to other ways mentioned. 1974 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U74-75.

Filing of copy of annexation ordinance with Secretary of State is for informational purposes only. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 81-21.

Requirement that copy of annexation ordinance be filed with Secretary of State is ancillary to annexation procedure rather than integral. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 81-21.

Time of filing ordinance does not affect time annexation takes effect. Municipal annexation of property takes effect even though filing of copy of ordinance with Secretary of State, as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-21, is delayed or omitted. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 81-21.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 38 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 60 et seq., 73, 74, 80.

ALR. - Power to extend boundaries of municipal corporations, 64 A.L.R. 1335.

Estoppel to question validity of proceedings extending boundaries of municipality, 101 A.L.R. 581.

Power to detach land from municipal corporations, towns, or villages, 117 A.L.R. 267.

Capacity to attack the fixing or extension of municipal limits or boundary, 13 A.L.R.2d 1279, 17 A.L.R.5th 195.

What zoning regulations are applicable to territory annexed to a municipality, 41 A.L.R.2d 1463.

Zoning: validity and construction of provisions of zoning statute or ordinance regarding protest by neighboring property owners, 7 A.L.R.4th 732.

Right of one governmental subdivision to challenge annexation proceedings by another such subdivision, 17 A.L.R.5th 195.

36-36-22. Deannexation; authority; procedures; identification; status of lands.

Statute text

Authority is granted to the governing bodies of the several municipal corporations of this state to deannex an area or areas of the existing corporate limits thereof, in accordance with the procedures provided in this article and in Article 1 of this chapter, upon the written and signed applications of all of the owners of all of the land, except the owners of any public street, road, highway, or right of way, proposed to be deannexed, containing a complete description of the lands to be deannexed and the adoption of a resolution by the governing authority of the county in which such property is located consenting to such deannexation. Lands to be deannexed at any one time shall be treated as one body, regardless of the number of owners, and all parts shall be considered as adjoining the limits of the municipal corporation when any one part of the entire body abuts such limits. When such application is acted upon by the municipal authorities and the land is, by ordinance, deannexed from the municipal corporation, an identification of the property so deannexed shall be filed with the Department of Community Affairs and with the governing authority of the county in which the property is located in accordance with Code Section 36-36-3. When so deannexed, such lands shall cease to constitute a part of the lands within the corporate limits of the municipal corporation as completely and fully as if the limits had been marked and defined by local Act of the General Assembly.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-22, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 652, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 7.)

36-36-23. Annexation by a municipal corporation into an adjoining county.

Statute text

(a) Annexation pursuant to this article by a municipal corporation into an adjoining county in which the municipality is not already located shall be accomplished in accordance with this Code section. Within ten business days of receiving an application for annexation, the municipal corporation shall provide written notice to the county governing authority of the adjoining county of its intent to annex into the county. Such notice shall include a map or other description of the land proposed for annexation sufficient for the county to identify the location of the proposed annexation. A meeting between the county governing authority and municipal governing authority shall be held to discuss the proposed annexation if the county governing authority files a written request for such meeting with the municipal governing authority within 15 days of receipt of the notice of the proposed annexation. The requested meeting shall be held within 15 days of the request by the county unless otherwise agreed to by the county and the municipality.

(b) No municipality may annex into an adjoining county in which the municipality is not already located unless otherwise agreed to by the county governing authority of the adjoining county. Such annexation shall be deemed approved, unless the county governing authority adopts a resolution opposing the annexation within 30 days following the earlier of:

(1) The completion of the meeting between the municipal and county governing authorities, if any, pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section; or

(2) Thirty days after notice of the proposed annexation from the municipal corporation to the county governing authority, if no meeting is requested by the county governing authority.

(c) In making its decision, the county governing authority shall consider the following factors:

(1) Whether the annexation ordinance is reasonable for the long-range economic and overall well-being of the counties, school districts, and municipalities affected by the annexation;

(2) Whether the health, safety, and welfare of property owners and citizens of the county, municipalities, and area proposed to be annexed will be negatively affected by the annexation;

(3) Whether the proposed annexation has any negative fiscal impact on the county, school districts, and other municipalities that have not been mitigated by an agreement; and

(4) The interests of the property owner seeking annexation.

(d) If the county governing authority disapproves the annexation, the municipal corporation may challenge the disapproval by filing a complaint in the superior court of the adjoining county into which such annexation has been proposed. The challenge shall be heard by either a judge or senior judge who is not from the circuit in which either the county or the municipality is located. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the determination by the county based upon the factors enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section is correct, then the denial by the county shall be sustained. If the denial is not sustained, the annexation may proceed.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-36-23, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 8.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

——————————

ARTICLE 3

ANNEXATION PURSUANT TO APPLICATION BY OWNERS OF 60 PERCENT OF LAND AND 60 PERCENT OF ELECTORS

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-36-22.1, pertaining to limitation on annexation by certain municipalities, was repealed pursuant to subsection (c) thereof, effective July 1, 1991. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1984, p. 976, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 284, § 1; and Ga. L. 1990, p. 1396, § 1.

Cross references. - Time limit for reannexing property which has been deannexed by the General Assembly, § 36-35-2(b).

36-36-30. "Municipal corporation" defined.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term "municipal corporation" means a municipal corporation which has a population of 200 or more persons according to the United States decennial census of 1960 or any future such census.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 7; Code 1981, § 36-36-20; Code 1981, § 36-36-30, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-20 as present Code Section 36-36-30.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

City failed to comply with publishing requirements. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of a county because the city failed to publish a notice as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-36(a) that accurately described the property to be annexed; thus, the city failed to comply, or to substantially comply, with the requirements of that statute. City of Lovejoy v. Clayton County, 335 Ga. App. 881, 783 S.E.2d 395 (2016).

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 24, 25.

36-36-31. "Contiguous area" defined; determination of aggregate external boundary.

Statute text

(a) As used in this article, the term "contiguous area" means any area of which at least one-eighth of the aggregate external boundary, at the time annexation procedures are initiated, directly abuts the municipal boundary. Any area shall also be a "contiguous area" if at least one-eighth of its aggregate external boundary would directly abut the municipal boundary if not otherwise separated, in whole or in part, from the municipal boundary by lands owned by the municipal corporation, by lands owned by a county, or by lands owned by this state or by the definite width of (1) any street or street right of way, (2) any creek or river, or (3) any right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation.

(b) For purposes of determining an area's aggregate external boundary, all real property which, at the time annexation procedures are initiated, (1) is owned by the same person who owns real property in the area to be annexed, (2) adjoins to any extent such owner's real property in the area to be annexed, (3) is in the same county as the real property in the area to be annexed, and (4) is not included within the boundaries of any municipal corporation shall have its area included in determining the aggregate external boundary of the area to be annexed.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 5; Ga. L. 1971, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1011, § 2; Code 1981, § 36-36-21; Code 1981, § 36-36-31, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-21 as present Code Section 36-36-31.

Law reviews. - For article discussing municipal annexation and the concept of contiguity, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 167 (1974).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Contiguous property not found. - Parcel which the city attempted to annex and which was separated from the city boundary by three parcels: one owned by the county, one owned by the power company, and one over which the Georgia Department of Transportation had a right of way, was not a contiguous area since the power company property did not fall within any of the exceptions of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-31(a). Since the power company property was owned in fee simple by the power company, the power company had the ability to grant the property to another party at any time thereby potentially allowing the subject property to become an isolated municipal island precluding annexation of the subject parcel. City of Buford v. Gwinnett County, 262 Ga. App. 248, 585 S.E.2d 122 (2003).

Cited in City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - What land is contiguous or adjacent to municipality so as to be subject to annexation, 49 A.L.R.3d 589.

36-36-32. Annexation upon application of owners of 60 percent of the land and 60 percent of the resident electors generally; application and signature requirements.

Statute text

(a) Authority is granted to the governing bodies of the several municipal corporations of this state to annex to the existing corporate limits thereof unincorporated areas which are contiguous to the existing corporate limits at the time of such annexation, in accordance with the procedures provided in this article and in Article 1 of this chapter, upon the written and signed application of not less than 60 percent of the electors resident in the area included in any such application and of the owners of not less than 60 percent of the land area, by acreage, included in such application. The authority granted in this Code section is in addition to existing authority and is intended to provide a cumulative method of annexing territory to municipal corporations in addition to those methods provided by present law.

(b) Each such application shall contain a complete description of the land proposed to be annexed. Lands to be annexed at any one time shall be treated as one body, regardless of the number of owners, and all parts shall be considered as adjoining the limits of the municipal corporation when any one part of the entire body abuts such limits.

(c) Each person signing an application for annexation shall also print or type thereon his name, address, and the date of signature. In addition, he shall indicate whether he is a landowner within the area to be annexed, an elector, or both.

(d) For the purpose of determining the percentage of electors signing such application, the municipal governing body shall obtain a list of electors residing in such area from the board of registrars of the county or counties in which the area lies. The list shall be compiled by the board of registrars and provided to the municipal governing body in accordance with Code Section 21-2-227. The municipal governing body shall bear the expense of the preparation of the list in the manner prescribed by such Code section.

(e) For the purpose of determining ownership of the property included within such application, the record titleholder of the fee simple title or his legal representative shall be considered the "owner" of the property.

(f) Signatures of owners of public roads and other public land within the area to be annexed shall not be required in satisfying the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section and the acreage of such public properties shall be excluded from acreage calculations pertaining to the landowner approval required by subsection (a) of this Code section. This subsection applies only where the public properties are included in the area to be annexed.

(g) The necessary number of signatures of landowners and electors shall be obtained within one calendar year following the date of the first signature obtained. Failure to collect the required number within the one-year period shall invalidate previously collected signatures. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit collection of signatures from the same persons on subsequent applications for annexation.

History
